Hawaii, session 2026, SB2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 21G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§21G-    Capitol visitor center; established.  (a) There is established within the state capitol a capitol visitor center to: (1)  Inform and educate visitors on the history and legacy of the state legislature; (2)  Inform and educate visitors about and assist visitors in navigating the state capitol in collaboration with the office of the governor; and (3)  Promote the State's attractions, including its natural resources, cultural heritage, experiences, and locally produced goods and services. (b)  The capitol visitor center shall be maintained and operated by the legislative reference bureau. SECTION 2.  Section 21D-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§21D-6  Joint legislative access committee.[]] There is established the joint legislative access committee which shall be composed of members of the legislature. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint a co-chair and two members or more to the committee, one of whom shall be a member of the minority party. The committee shall: (1)  Oversee the staff and operations of the legislative broadcast project, and recommend policies for the project which shall be adopted by concurrent resolution; and (2)  Review the operations of the public access room, legislative internet project[,] capitol visitor center, and other public access projects of the legislature and recommend policies for these projects to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives." SECTION 3.  Section 21G-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§21G-1[]] Purpose.  The purpose of this chapter is to establish a permanent public access program to ensure improved public participation in the legislative process[.] and improved public access to the history and legacy of the state legislature and the state capitol." SECTION 4.  Section 23G-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§23G-3  General purposes of bureau.  The purpose of the office of the legislative reference bureau shall be to: (1)  Provide a comprehensive research and reference service on legislative problems for the legislature; (2)  Conduct impartial research, including legal research, as may be necessary for the enactment of substantive legislation, upon request by the legislature, legislative committees, or legislators, or on its own initiative; (3)  Disseminate its research findings to the legislature on all research projects undertaken upon the request of the legislature or legislative committees; (4)  Secure reports of various officers and boards of the State and as far as may be of the states and of the other territories of the United States and such other material, periodicals, or books as will furnish the fullest information practicable upon all matters pertaining to current or proposed legislative problems; (5)  Secure information for the legislature, legislative committees, and legislators by cooperating with the legislative reference services in the states and with the legislative service conference maintained by the council of state governments; (6)  Maintain a reference library for use by the legislature and legislative service agencies.  Subject to the priorities established by the director, reference materials may be made available to the various departments and agencies of the State and the general public; (7)  Draft or aid in drafting bills, resolutions, memorials, and amendments thereto, including committee reports, for the legislature, legislative committees, and legislators when requested; (8)  Control and maintain the operations of any legislative data processing program as may be established; (9)  Serve, upon request, in an advisory capacity to the legislature and its committees on all matters within its competencies and responsibilities; (10)  Assist, upon request, legislative service agencies on matters within its competency; (11)  Perform the function of statute revision and publication of session laws, supplements, and replacement volumes; and (12)  Maintain and operate the public access room and capitol visitor center established by chapter 21G." SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of the capitol visitor center, including the establishment and hiring of     full-time equivalent ( FTE) positions. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the legislative reference bureau for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________